Maine, session 132, LD1311.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA c. 279 is enacted to read:
CHAPTER 279
MAINE HEALTH CARE EDUCATION TRAINING AND MEDICAL
RESIDENCY FUND
§1700-F. Maine Health Care Education Training and Medical Residency Fund
1. Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Earn as you learn program" means a program in which a student or learner is
employed and is paid for learning specific skills and expertise for a particular role.
B. "Rural" means, with regard to areas in the State, the areas that are designated as
health professional shortage areas or medically underserved areas or that contain a
medically underserved population as defined by the federal Department of Health and
Human Services, Health Resources and Services Administration.
2. Fund established. The Maine Health Care Education Training and Medical
Residency Fund, referred to in this chapter as "the fund," is established within the
department as a dedicated, nonlapsing account to support health care in rural and
underserved communities and physician workforce development.
3. Fund sources and administration. The fund consists of appropriations, allocations
and contributions from public and private sources. The department may apply for federal
and private grant funding for the purposes of this section. Money received by the
department on behalf of the fund must be used for the purposes of this section. The fund
must be maintained and administered by the department. Any unexpended balance in the
fund carries forward for continued use under this section, except for federal funds that must
be expended according to guidelines issued by the Federal Government governing the use
of those funds.
4. Use of fund. The department shall make distributions from the fund to programs
based in the State to support the following purposes:
A. Expanding rural primary care clinical rotations for 3rd-year medical students to
support long-term professional health care practice in the rural parts of the State;
B. Expanding rural primary care clinical rotations for 4th-year medical students to
support long-term professional health care practice in the rural parts of the State;
C. Expanding rural residency positions and rotations for medical students in the State;
D. Establishing and expanding clinical preceptorships in rural and underserved
communities, including the costs of preceptor recruiting, training and compensation for
preceptor time and the costs of travel and housing for medical students in rural
rotations;
E. Supporting programs that seek to develop local health care education leaders for the
purpose of expanding clinical rotations, residencies and preceptorships;
Page 1 - 132LR1626(01)

F. Providing competitive grants through a program designed by the department for
innovative solutions, technological advancements and earn as you learn programs to
support and expand clinical education, training and placements for clinical health care
roles. The department shall consult with experts in the field of health care in designing
the grant program; and
G. Supporting electronic platforms used to make clinical health care placements.
5. Rules. The department may adopt rules to implement this section. Rules adopted
pursuant to this subsection are routine technical rules as defined in Title 5, chapter 375,
subchapter 2-A.
Sec. 2. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES, DEPARTMENT OF
Maine Health Care Education Training and Medical Residency Fund N433
Initiative: Provides ongoing funding to the Maine Health Care Education Training and
Medical Residency Fund.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $5,000,000 $5,000,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $5,000,000 $5,000,000